Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-308
Writ of possession; issuance; when.

If the successful claimant shall elect to pay and does pay to the occupant or claimant the balance found due him on the final hearing, within such time as the court shall direct, then a writ of possession shall be issued in his favor against such occupant, or decree shall be entered against such unsuccessful claimant, as the case may require.

Laws 1883, c. 59, § 8, p. 253;

R.S.1913, § 6262;

C.S.1922, § 5672;

C.S.1929, § 76-308;

R.S.1943, § 76-308.